New York, session 2025-2026, A8619.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3-300 of the village law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 36 to read as follows: 3 36. Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter or any other gener- 4 al law, local law, ordinance or special act, the village board of trus- 5 tees of the incorporated village of Baxter Estates, Nassau county, may, 6 by resolution, provide that the office of village clerk-treasurer or 7 deputy clerk of such village may be held by a person who is not a resi- 8 dent of such village, provided that such person resides in the county of 9 Nassau or in an adjoining county within the state of New York. 10 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 11 subdivision 76 to read as follows: 12 76. In the village of Baxter Estates, in the county of Nassau, the 13 provisions of this section requiring a person to be a resident of the 14 political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state for which 15 such person shall be chosen or within which such person's official func- 16 tions are required to be exercised, shall not prevent such person from 17 holding the office of village clerk-treasurer or deputy clerk of the 18 village of Baxter Estates, provided that such person resides in Nassau 19 county or an adjoining county within the state of New York; provided, 20 however, any person performing such functions of village clerk-treasurer 21 or deputy clerk in any other village shall be a resident of such 22 village, unless otherwise provided by law. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13101-01-5